SpellChecking/Dictionaries/latin persian.aff
#The derivative suffix i making adjectives(sefatsāz)
SFX y Y 42
SFX y   0     i/o        [^']
SFX y   0     i/o        [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX y   '     i/o        [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX y   w     vi/o       ow
SFX y   ow   avi/o     ow
SFX y   0     yi/o       [ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX y   0     i/e        [^']
SFX y   0     i/e        [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX y   '     i/e        [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX y   w     vi/e       ow
SFX y   ow   avi/e     ow
SFX y   0     yi/e       [ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX y   0     i/i        [^']
SFX y   0     i/i        [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX y   '     i/i        [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX y   w     vi/i       ow
SFX y   ow   avi/i     ow
SFX y   0     yi/i       [ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX y   0     i/b        [^']
SFX y   0     i/b        [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX y   '     i/b        [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX y   w     vi/b       ow
SFX y   ow   avi/b     ow
SFX y   0     yi/b       [ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX y   0     i/p        [^']
SFX y   0     i/p        [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX y   '     i/p        [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX y   w     vi/p       ow
SFX y   ow   avi/p     ow
SFX y   0     yi/p       [ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX y   0     i/c        [^']
SFX y   0     i/c        [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX y   '     i/c        [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX y   w     vi/c       ow
SFX y   ow   avi/c     ow
SFX y   0     yi/c       [ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX y   0     i/s        [^']
SFX y   0     i/s        [^a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX y   '     i/s        [a,ā,e,i,o,u,ow]'
SFX y   w     vi/s       ow
SFX y   ow   avi/s     ow
SFX y   0     yi/s       [ā,e,i,o,u,ow]

#The the plural suffix hā
SFX h Y 5
SFX h         0           hā/e       .
SFX h         0           hā/i       .
SFX h         0           hā/o       .
SFX h         0           hā/b      .
SFX h         0           hā/p       .

#The the plural suffix ān
SFX ā Y 30
SFX ā         0           ān/e       [^ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX ā         0           yān/e      [ā,i,u]
SFX ā         0           gān/e      e
SFX ā         0           vān/e      o
SFX ā         w           vān/e      ow
SFX ā         ow         avān/e     ow
SFX ā         0           ān/i       [^ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX ā         0           yān/i      [ā,i,u]
SFX ā         0           gān/i      e
SFX ā         0           vān/i      o
SFX ā         w           vān/i      ow
SFX ā         ow         avān/i     ow
SFX ā         0           ān/o       [^ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX ā         0           yān/o      [ā,i,u]
SFX ā         0           gān/o      e
SFX ā         0           vān/o      o
SFX ā         w           vān/o      ow
SFX ā         ow         avān/o     ow
SFX ā         0           ān/b       [^ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX ā         0           yān/b      [ā,i,u]
SFX ā         0           gān/b      e
SFX ā         0           vān/b      o
SFX ā         w           vān/b      ow
SFX ā         ow         avān/b     ow
SFX ā         0           ān/p       [^ā,e,i,o,u,ow]
SFX ā         0           yān/p      [ā,i,u]
SFX ā         0           gān/p      e
SFX ā         0           vān/p      o
SFX ā         w           vān/p      ow
SFX ā         ow         avān/p     ow

#The comparative suffix 
SFX c Y 7
SFX c         0           tar/h     .
SFX c         0           tar/ā     .
SFX c         0           tar/e     .
SFX c         0           tar/i     .
SFX c         0           tar/o     .
SFX c         0           tar/b     .
SFX c         0           tar/p     .

#The superlative suffix 
SFX s Y 7
SFX s         0           tarin/h     .
SFX s         0           tarin/ā     .
SFX s         0           tarin/e     .
SFX s         0           tarin/i     .
SFX s         0           tarin/o     .
SFX s         0           tarin/b     .
SFX s         0           tarin/p     .

#The ordinal suffixes
SFX O Y 54
SFX O         0           om/e       [^e,i,o]
SFX O         0           vvom/e     [e,o]
SFX O         0           yom/e     i
SFX O         0           omi/e       [^e,i,o]
SFX O         0           vvomi/e     [e,o]
SFX O         0           yomi/e     i
SFX O         0           omin/e       [^e,i,o]
SFX O         0           vvomin/e     [e,o]
SFX O         0           yomin/e     i
SFX O         0           om/i       [^e,i,o]
SFX O         0           vvom/i     [e,o]
SFX O         0           yom/i     i
SFX O         0           omi/i       [^e,i,o]
SFX O         0           vvomi/i     [e,o]
SFX O         0           yomi/i     i
SFX O         0           omin/i       [^e,i,o]
SFX O         0           vvomin/i     [e,o]
SFX O         0           yomin/i     i
SFX O         0           om/b       [^e,i,o]
SFX O         0           vvom/b     [e,o]
SFX O         0           yom/b     i
SFX O         0           omi/b       [^e,i,o]
SFX O         0           vvomi/b     [e,o]
SFX O         0           yomi/b     i
SFX O         0           omin/b       [^e,i,o]
SFX O         0           vvomin/b     [e,o]
SFX O         0           yomin/b     i
SFX O         0           om/p       [^e,i,o]
SFX O         0           vvom/p     [e,o]
SFX O         0           yom/p     i
SFX O         0           omi/p       [^e,i,o]
SFX O         0           vvomi/p     [e,o]
SFX O         0           yomi/p     i
SFX O         0           omin/p       [^e,i,o]
SFX O         0           vvomin/p     [e,o]
SFX O         0           yomin/p     i
SFX O         0           om/h       [^e,i,o]
SFX O         0           vvom/h     [e,o]
SFX O         0           yom/h     i
SFX O         0           omi/h       [^e,i,o]
SFX O         0           vvomi/h     [e,o]
SFX O         0           yomi/h     i
SFX O         0           omin/h       [^e,i,o]
SFX O         0           vvomin/h     [e,o]
SFX O         0           yomin/h     i
SFX O         0           om/o       [^e,i,o]
SFX O         0           vvom/o     [e,o]
SFX O         0           yom/o     i
SFX O         0           omi/o       [^e,i,o]
SFX O         0           vvomi/o     [e,o]
SFX O         0           yomi/o     i
SFX O         0           omin/o       [^e,i,o]
SFX O         0           vvomin/o     [e,o]
SFX O         0           yomin/o     i

#The form suffix for numbers
SFX g Y 7
SFX g         0           gāne/h      .
SFX g         0           gāne/ā       .
SFX g         0           gāne/e       .
SFX g         0           gāne/i       .
SFX g         0           gāne/o       .
SFX g         0           gāne/b       .
SFX g         0           gāne/p       .

#The present stem suffixes
SFX v Y 18
SFX v         0           am/p       [^ā,i,u,ow]
SFX v         0           yam/p      [ā,i,u]
SFX v         ow        avam/p      ow
SFX v         0           i/p       [^ā,i,u,ow]
SFX v         0           yi/p      [ā,i,u]
SFX v         ow        avi/p       ow
SFX v         0           ad/p       [^ā,i,u,ow]
SFX v         0           yad/p      [ā,i,u]
SFX v         ow        avad/p       ow
SFX v         0           im/p       [^ā,i,u,ow]
SFX v         0           yim/p      [ā,i,u]
SFX v         ow        avim/p       ow
SFX v         0           id/p       [^ā,i,u,ow]
SFX v         0           yid/p      [ā,i,u]
SFX v         ow        avid/p       ow
SFX v         0           and/p       [^ā,i,u,ow]
SFX v         0           yand/p      [ā,i,u]
SFX v         ow        avand/p       ow

#The past stem suffixes
SFX V Y 11
SFX V   0     am/p       .
SFX V   0     i/p       .
SFX V   0     im/p       .
SFX V   0     id/p       .
SFX V   0     and/p       .
SFX V   0     e/p         .
SFX V   0     eam/p         .
SFX V   0     ei/p         .
SFX V   0     eim/p         .
SFX V   0     eid/p         .
SFX V   0     eand/p         .

#Preverb na
PFX n Y 2
PFX n   0          na              [^a,ā,o]
PFX n   0          nay            [a,ā,o]
