SpellChecking/Dictionaries/latin persian.dic
afsor/nPv
afsordan/aābehiopxnPV
āgāh/nPv
ālā/nPv
alakixoš/aābehiopxycs
āludešode/aābehiopxycs
āmad/nPV
āmiz/nPv
andāxt/nPV
angiz/nPv
angizānid/nPV
anjāmid/nPV
aqiqi/aābehiopxycs
ārā/nPv
āšām/nPv
āšāmid/nPV
āsemānsang/aābehiopx
āšxor/aābehiopxycs
āzār/nPv
āzord/nPV
bādāb/aābehiopxycs
badgowhar/aābehiopxycs
bāftan/aābehiopxnPV
bāqi/aābehiopxycs
bar/nPv
Batlamiyus/aābehiopx
bāxošunat/aābehiopxycs
baxšānd/nPV
baxšāyidan/aābehiopxnPV
besāz/aābehiopxycs
bifāsele/aābehiopxycs
bijā/aābehiopxycs
bilyuno/aābehiopxHgO
bist/aābehiopxCgO
bisto/aābehiopxCgO
bitakallof/aābehiopxycs
bixt/nPV
biz/nPv
budāyism/aābehiopx
busidan/aābehiopxnPV
cāhār/aābehiopxAgO
cāhārdah/aābehiopxBgO
cāhārdarb/aābehiopxycs
cāhārsad/aābehiopxDgO
cāhārsado/aābehiopxDgO
capānd/nPV
cart/nPv
cartid/nPV
ceceni/aābehiopxycs
cehel/aābehiopxCgO
cehelo/aābehiopxCgO
cekānd/nPV
cekidan/aābehiopxnPV
cešān/nPv
cešid/nPV
corukid/nPV
dāem/aābehiopx
dah/aābehiopxBgO
damid/nPV
darbast/aābehiopxycs
davāzdah/aābehiopxBgO
degargošni/aābehiopx
deh/nPv
delārām/aābehiopxycs
derangid/nPV
deravid/nPV
devist/aābehiopxDgO
devisto/aābehiopxDgO
divist/aābehiopxDgO
divisto/aābehiopxDgO
do/aābehiopxAgO
donyādust/aābehiopxycs
dozdid/nPV
durandāxtani/aābehiopxycs
dusid/nPV
ehmālkār/aābehiopxycs
elqāy/nPv
eqfālšode/aābehiopxycs
eqtedārgerāyāne/aābehiopx
e'terāzi/aābehiopxycs
Ezzatnežād/aābehiopx
fahmānd/nPV
farhixt/nPV
farmānbar/aābehiopxycs
farsāy/nPv
farsāyid/nPV
fešānd/nPV
fešārpāyin/aābehiopxycs
fešord/nPV
foruzān/aābehiopxycs
gard/nPv
gardān/nPv
gereft/nPV
gery/nPv
girān/nPv
gis/aābehiopx
golmangoli/aābehiopxycs
gomāštan/aābehiopxnPV
gorixt/nPV
gošāy/nPv
gosixt/nPV
gozaštan/aābehiopxnPV
gozidan/aābehiopxnPV
guz/nPv
haft/aābehiopxAgO
haftād/aābehiopxCgO
haftādo/aābehiopxCgO
haftsad/aābehiopxDgO
hamcasbi/aābehiopx
haraskonande/aābehiopxycs
hašt/aābehiopxAgO
haštādo/aābehiopxCgO
haštsado/aābehiopxDgO
hejdah/aābehiopxBgO
hekmatāmuz/aābehiopxycs
hezāro/aābehiopxEgO
jadval/aābehiopx
jahannami/aābehiopxycs
jast/nPV
jonbid/nPV
joz/aābehiopx
ju/nPv
juy/nPv
kamforuš/aābehiopxycs
kārgošā/aābehiopxycs
kāvān/nPv
kāvānid/nPV
kāvid/nPV
koneši/aābehiopxycs
kucān/nPv
kufi/aābehiopxycs
lāf/nPv
lamid/nPV
laqq/nPv
lehān/nPv
lehidan/aābehiopxnPV
limu/aābehiopx
lisid/nPV
mālide/aābehiopxycs
mamnuolvorud/aābehiopxycs
maxmalak/aābehiopx
milyārd/aābehiopxggO
milyārder/aābehiopxycs
milyārdo/aābehiopxggO
milyuno/aābehiopxFgO
moāyene/aābehiopx
moqtane'/aābehiopxycs
mord/nPV
mors/aābehiopx
mowredealāqe/aābehiopxycs
mozāre'/aābehiopx
nalisi/nPv
nāmar'i/aābehiopxycs
namāyānd/nPV
nāmšenāsi/aābehiopx
navado/aābehiopxCgO
nāvāred/aābehiopxycs
nazāyer/aābehiopx
nāzidan/aābehiopxnPV
nohsad/aābehiopxDgO
noqrefām/aābehiopxycs
Nureddin/aābehiopx
nuš/nPv
nuzdah/aābehiopxBgO
oftādan/aābehiopxnPV
pālānid/nPV
panjāh/aābehiopxCgO
pānsad/aābehiopxDgO
pānzdah/aābehiopxBgO
pāpardedār/aābehiopxycs
parāši/nPv
parišid/nPV
parvarānidan/aābehiopxnPV
pastfetrat/aābehiopxycs
pāy/nPv
pažuhid/nPV
pendārid/nPV
picān/nPv
picid/nPV
pileduzi/aābehiopx
portarāvat/aābehiopxycs
pozid/nPV
pusān/nPv
puye/aābehiopx
qaltānidan/aābehiopxnPV
qazzāq/aābehiopx
qeymati/aābehiopxycs
qor'ānšenās/aābehiopxycs
qotbid/nPV
rābean/aābehiopx
rahān/nPv
raqsid/nPV
ras/nPv
rasān/nPv
rixtan/aābehiopxnPV
riz/nPv
roāyā/aābehiopx
rombid/nPV
sā/nPv
šabnešin/aābehiopxycs
sado/aābehiopxDgO
šahādatpaziri/aābehiopx
sarābgune/aābehiopxycs
sarfidan/aābehiopxnPV
sarnešindār/aābehiopxycs
šasto/aābehiopxCgO
sāyidan/aābehiopxnPV
sāz/nPv
šekanandegi/aābehiopx
šenāsāndan/aābehiopxnPV
sepār/nPv
šeš/aābehiopxAgO
šešsado/aābehiopxDgO
setānd/nPV
setordan/aābehiopxnPV
si/aābehiopxCgO
šik/aābehiopxycs
širmāl/aābehiopx
sisado/aābehiopxDgO
sizdah/aābehiopxBgO
sonb/nPv
šurānidan/aābehiopxnPV
šurid/nPV
šuridehāl/aābehiopxycs
suy/nPv
tadārokdidešode/aābehiopxycs
tākonun/aābehiopx
tan/nPv
tanidan/aābehiopxnPV
taqziyei/aābehiopxycs
tarakidan/aābehiopxnPV
tarsān/nPv
tarsidan/aābehiopxnPV
terelyuno/aābehiopxIgO
terilyuno/aābehiopxIgO
tiq/nPv
tiresāzi/aābehiopx
towlidkonande/aābehiopxycs
tuxtan/aābehiopxnPV
tuz/nPv
xalān/nPv
xan/nPv
xandāndan/aābehiopxnPV
xaridār/aābehiopxycs
xātamolanbiyā/aābehiopx
xazān/nPv
xisānidan/aābehiopxnPV
xor/nPvY
yāb/nPv
yek/aābehiopxAgO
yekfarhangi/aābehiopxycs
yeksado/aābehiopxDgO
yunidan/aābehiopxnPV
žarfbin/aābehiopxycs
zibāyiyāfarin/aābehiopxycs
zodāy/nPv
zodāy/nPv
